New York, session 2025-2026, A10388.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 1367-a of the racing, pari-mutuel 2 wagering and breeding law is amended by adding a new paragraph (c) to 3 read as follows: 4 (c) "School property" for purposes of this section, shall have the 5 same meaning as such term is defined by subdivision one of section elev- 6 en of the education law. 7 § 2. Paragraph (d) of subdivision 2 of section 1367-a of the racing, 8 pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law, as added by section 4 of part Y 9 of chapter 59 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 10 (d) All sports wagers through electronic communication placed in 11 accordance with this section are considered placed or otherwise made 12 when and where received by the mobile sports wagering licensee on such 13 mobile sports wagering licensee's server or other equipment used to 14 accept mobile sports wagering at a licensed gaming facility, regardless 15 of the authorized sports bettor's physical location within the state at 16 the time the sports wager is placed, except on school property; and 17 provided further that the intermediate routing of electronic data in 18 connection with mobile sports wagering shall not determine the location 19 or locations in which a wager is initiated, received or otherwise made. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14916-01-6